Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF9.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1032YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 9 Section 1. Section 279.84, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 279.84 School security ââ school security personnel grant 3 program . 4 1. For purposes of this section : 5 a. âPrivate school security officerâ means an individual 6 employed by a private security business who possesses a permit 7 to carry weapons issued under section 724.6 . 8 b. âPrivate security businessâ means the same as defined in 9 section 80A.1 . 10 c. âSchool resource officerâ means any of the following: 11 (1) A peace officer as defined in section 801.4 . 12 (2) A reserve peace officer as defined in section 80D.1A . 13 2. The board of directors of each school district with 14 a total enrollment of at least eight thousand students shall 15 employ, or retain the services of, at least one private school 16 security officer or school resource officer to guard each 17 attendance center where students enrolled in grade nine, grade 18 ten, grade eleven, or grade twelve regularly attend classes, 19 unless a majority of the members of the board of directors of 20 the school district vote to not employ or retain a private 21 school security officer or a school resource officer. A 22 private school security officer employed or retained by the 23 board of directors of a school district pursuant to this 24 subsection shall be required to participate in the annual live 25 scenario training and quarterly live firearms training approved 26 by the department of public safety pursuant to section 724.6, 27 subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (3). 28 3. The board of directors of each school district with 29 a total enrollment of less than eight thousand students is 30 encouraged to employ, or retain the services of, at least one 31 private school security officer or school resource officer 32 to guard each attendance center where students enrolled in 33 grade nine, grade ten, grade eleven, or grade twelve regularly 34 attend classes. A private school security officer employed 35 -1- LSB 1032YH (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 9 or retained by the board of directors of a school district 1 pursuant to this subsection shall be required to participate in 2 the annual live scenario training and quarterly live firearms 3 training approved by the department of public safety pursuant 4 to section 724.6, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph 5 (3). 6 4. a. The department of education shall develop and 7 administer a school security personnel grant program to provide 8 annual grants to match moneys provided by school districts 9 with a total enrollment of less than one thousand students to 10 allow such school districts to offset costs associated with 11 employing, or retaining the services of, a private school 12 security officer or school resource officer. The amount of 13 an annual grant provided by the department of education to a 14 school district that has provided matching moneys pursuant to 15 this subsection shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. 16 b. A school security personnel grant program fund is 17 established in the state treasury. The fund shall be 18 administered by the department of education and shall consist 19 of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys 20 received by the department for deposit in the fund. The moneys 21 in the fund are appropriated to the department for the school 22 security personnel grant program. Notwithstanding section 23 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall 24 not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain 25 available for expenditure for the school security personnel 26 grant program for subsequent fiscal years. 27